testdata/short-invalid.dix
<pardef n="/avoir__vblex">

            
                        <e><p><l>a</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ai</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aie</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aie</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aie</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aient</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aies</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ait</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>as</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aura</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aurai</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>auraient</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aurais</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aurais</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aurait</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>auras</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aurez</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>auriez</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aurions</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aurons</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>auront</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>avaient</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>avais</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>avais</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>avait</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>avez</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>aviez</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>avions</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>avoir</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>avons</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ayant</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ayant</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ayez</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ayez</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ayez</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ayons</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ayons</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ayons</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eu</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eue</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eues</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eurent</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eus</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eus</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eus</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eusse</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eussent</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eusses</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eussiez</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eussions</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eut</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eûmes</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eût</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>eûtes</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><p><l>ont</l><r>avoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

<pardef n="lu/i[]re__vblex">

   
                        <e>
     <p>
       <l>î</l>
       <r>i</r>
     </p>
     <i/>
     <par n="lu&#xEE;/mes__vblex"/>
   </e>

   
                        <e>
     <i>i</i>
     <par n="lui/re__vblex"/>
   </e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">

            
                        <e><re>,</re><p><l/><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

<pardef n="numeros">

            
                        <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>

            
                        <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

  <pardef n="pardret">

            
                        <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l/><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

 <pardef n="paresq">

            
                        <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l/><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

  <pardef n="separ">
        
                        <e><re>¿</re><p><l/><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

                        <e><par n="coma"/></e>
                        <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
                        <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
                        <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
                        <e><par n="separ"/></e>
                                 <e r="LR"><par n="/avoir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>l'habitude<b/>d'</l><r><g><b/>l'habitude<b/>de</g></r></p></e>
